District of Columbia statutes.
42-2105.01

Privatization of title services.

The Mayor may contract with, and pay all reasonable costs of, any person to research and quiet title to properties to be included in the Program. If services are provided by a person under this section and the property is subsequently redeemed by the owner or another party having an interest in the property, as allowed under § 47-847, the costs of the services shall be paid by the District and shall be included in the costs due to the District by the redeeming party under § 47-847.

Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 6a
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 801(e), 49 DCR 1468

History

This section is referenced in § 42-2802.

Section References

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”

Editor's Notes